Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4601
Act, how cited.

Sections 43-4601 to 43-4630 shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Deployed Parents Custody and Visitation Act.

Laws 2015, LB219, § 1.